Washington statutes.
RCW 43.103.060

Qualification for continued membership.

Any member of the council shall immediately cease to be a member if he or she ceases to hold the particular office or employment which was the basis of his or her appointment under RCW 43.103.040.

[ 1983 1st ex.s. c 16 s 6.]